Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1403
Legislature's Planning Committee;
duties.

The
Legislature's Planning Committee shall:

(1) Collect
and analyze data about Nebraska, including, but not limited to, demographics,
workforce, education, wages, wealth, tax structure, revenue, natural resources,
assets, challenges, trends, and growth and efficiency of government;

(2) Identify
long-term issues significant to the state;

(3) Set goals and benchmarks;

(4) Issue a
yearly report of its findings; and

(5) Propose legislation.

Laws 2009, LB653, § 3.